Rhode Island, session 2025, SB908.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 14-1-7.2 of the General Laws in Chapter 14-1 entitled "Proceedings
in Family Court" is hereby amended to read as follows:
14-1-7.2. Certification — Proof.
(a) Upon a motion by the attorney general pursuant to § 14-1-7, the court shall conduct a
hearing at which it shall be the duty of the attorney general to produce evidence to enable the court
to determine:
(1) Probable cause exists to believe that the offense charged has been committed and that
the child charged has committed it;
(2) The child’s past history of offenses, history of treatment, or the heinous or premeditated
nature of the offense is such that the court finds that the interests of society or the protection of the
public necessitate the certification; and
(3) The jurisdiction of the court but for the exercise of certification is in all likelihood an
insufficient period of time in which to accomplish a rehabilitation of the child.
(b) If the court finds that subdivisions (a)(1) — (a)(3) of this section have been proven by
a preponderance of evidence, it shall certify the child pursuant to § 14-1-7.3.
(c) Any person sixteen (16) years of age or older who has been found delinquent for having
committed two (2) offenses after the age of sixteen (16), which would render that person subject to
an indictment if he or she were an adult, shall be certified pursuant to this section. Any findings for

offenses which have occurred prior to April 11, 1990, shall be considered in making a determination
of eligibility for certification. Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit a waiver of
jurisdiction of any child pursuant to § 14-1-7.1.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002358
========
LC002358 - Page 2 of 3